Florida, session 2026, HB403.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Warrior Sacrifice Way designated; Department of
Transportation to erect suitable markers.—
(1) That portion of S.R. 295/Navy Boulevard between Duncan
Road and S.R. 292/Gulf Beach Highway in Escambia County is
designated as "Warrior Sacrifice Way."
(2) The Department of Transportation is directed to erect
suitable markers designating Warrior Sacrifice Way as described
in subsection (1).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb403-00